Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2921
Dispute Resolution Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Dispute Resolution Cash Fund is created. The State Court Administrator shall administer the fund. The fund shall consist of proceeds received pursuant to subdivision (9) of section 25-2908 and section 33-155. The fund shall be used to supplement the administration of the office and the support of the approved centers. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1996, LB 922, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 760, § 8;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB378, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 22.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.